utilities/dictionaries/mn_MN-Mongolian.aff
FLAG long
SFX 08 Y 42
SFX 08 0 гүй .
SFX 08 0 гүйг .
SFX 08 0 гүйгээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйгээр .
SFX 08 0 гүйгээрээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйгээс .
SFX 08 0 гүйгээсээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйд .
SFX 08 0 гүйдээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйн .
SFX 08 0 гүйнх .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхийг .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхийгээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхэд .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхдээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхээр .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхээрээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхээс .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхээсээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйнхээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэй .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйг .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйгээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйгээр .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйгээрээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйгээс .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйгээсээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйн .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнх .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхийг .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхийгээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхэд .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхдээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхээр .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхээрээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхээс .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйнхээсээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйд .
SFX 08 0 гүйтэйдээ .
SFX 08 0 гүйхэн .
SFX 08 0 гүйеэ .

SFX 0A Y 10
SFX 0A 0 нууд/040870 [^ьяён]
SFX 0A 0 уд/040870 [яё]
SFX 0A 0 ууд/040870 [^ч].н
SFX 0A н д/040870 ч.н
SFX 0A ь инууд/040870 ь
SFX 0A 0 нуудынх/040870 [^ьяён]
SFX 0A 0 удынх/040870 [яё]
SFX 0A 0 уудынх/040870 [^ч].н
SFX 0A н дынх/040870 ч.н
SFX 0A ь инуудынх/040870 ь

SFX 1A Y 12
SFX 1A 0 нууд/040870 [^ьяён]
SFX 1A 0 уд/040870 [яё]
SFX 1A 0 ууд/040870 [^ч].н
SFX 1A 0 ууд/040870 он
SFX 1A н д/040870 ч.н
SFX 1A ь инууд/040870 ь
SFX 1A 0 нуудынх/040870 [^ьяён]
SFX 1A 0 удынх/040870 [яё]
SFX 1A 0 уудынх/040870 [^ч].н
SFX 1A 0 уудынх/040870 он
SFX 1A н дынх/040870 ч.н
SFX 1A ь инуудынх/040870 ь

SFX 2A Y 8
SFX 2A 0 нүүд/070873 [^ьен]
SFX 2A 0 үд/070873 е
SFX 2A 0 үүд/070873 [^ч].н
SFX 2A н д/070873 ч.н
SFX 2A 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [^ьен]
SFX 2A 0 үдийнх/070873 е
SFX 2A 0 үүдийнх/070873 [^ч].н
SFX 2A н дийнх/070873 ч.н

SFX 3A Y 8
SFX 3A 0 нүүд/070873 [^ьен]
SFX 3A 0 үд/070873 е
SFX 3A 0 үүд/070873 [^ч].н
SFX 3A н д/070873 ч.н
SFX 3A 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [^ьен]
SFX 3A 0 үдийнх/070873 е
SFX 3A 0 үүдийнх/070873 [^ч].н
SFX 3A н дийнх/070873 ч.н

SFX 0B Y 24
SFX 0B 0 гууд/040870 аа
SFX 0B 0 гууд/040870 н
SFX 0B 0 гууд/040870 оо
SFX 0B 0 уд/040870 и
SFX 0B ь иуд/040870 ь
SFX 0B 0 ууд/040870 [^аоиьегнжчшйяеёу]
SFX 0B 0 гууд/040870 [еёу]
SFX 0B 0 ууд/040870 [жчш]
SFX 0B 0 ууд/040870 г
SFX 0B а ууд/040870 [^а]а
SFX 0B о ууд/040870 [^о]о
SFX 0B 0 нууд/040870 [йя]
SFX 0B 0 гуудынх/040870 аа
SFX 0B 0 гуудынх/040870 н
SFX 0B 0 гуудынх/040870 оо
SFX 0B 0 удынх/040870 [ияеё]
SFX 0B ь иудынх/040870 ь
SFX 0B 0 уудынх/040870 [^аоиьегнжчшйяеёу]
SFX 0B 0 гуудынх/040870 [еёу]
SFX 0B 0 уудынх/040870 [жчш]
SFX 0B 0 уудынх/040870 г
SFX 0B а уудынх/040870 [^а]а
SFX 0B о уудынх/040870 [^о]о
SFX 0B 0 нуудынх/040870 [йя]

SFX 1B Y 24
SFX 1B 0 гүүд/070873 н
SFX 1B 0 гүүд/070873 өө
SFX 1B 0 гүүд/070873 ээ
SFX 1B 0 үд/070873 и
SFX 1B ь иүд/070873 ь
SFX 1B 0 үүд/070873 [^эөиегнжчшйяеёүь]
SFX 1B 0 гүүд/070873 [еү]
SFX 1B 0 үүд/070873 [жчш]
SFX 1B 0 үүд/070873 г
SFX 1B ө үүд/070873 [^ө]ө
SFX 1B э үүд/070873 [^э]э
SFX 1B 0 нүүд/070873 [й]
SFX 1B 0 гүүдийнх/070873 н
SFX 1B 0 гүүдийнх/070873 өө
SFX 1B 0 гүүдийнх/070873 ээ
SFX 1B 0 үдийнх/070873 и
SFX 1B ь иүдийнх/070873 ь
SFX 1B 0 үүдийнх/070873 [^эөиегнжчшйяеёүь]
SFX 1B 0 гүүдийнх/070873 [еү]
SFX 1B 0 үүдийнх/070873 [жчш]
SFX 1B 0 үүдийнх/070873 г
SFX 1B ө үүдийнх/070873 [^ө]ө
SFX 1B э үүдийнх/070873 [^э]э
SFX 1B 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [й]

SFX 0C Y 40
SFX 0C 0 нууд/040870 [шглмс]
SFX 0C ав вууд/040870 ав
SFX 0C ад дууд/040870 ад
SFX 0C ан нууд/040870 ан
SFX 0C ар рууд/040870 ар
SFX 0C ац цууд/040870 ац
SFX 0C ач чууд/040870 ач
SFX 0C ов вууд/040870 ов
SFX 0C од дууд/040870 од
SFX 0C он нууд/040870 он
SFX 0C ор рууд/040870 ор
SFX 0C оц цууд/040870 оц
SFX 0C оч чууд/040870 оч
SFX 0C ид дууд/040870 ид
SFX 0C ир рууд/040870 ир
SFX 0C иц цууд/040870 иц
SFX 0C ах хууд/040870 ах
SFX 0C их хууд/040870 их
SFX 0C ин нууд/040870 ин
SFX 0C ит тууд/040870 [жчш]ит
SFX 0C 0 нуудынх/040870 [шглмс]
SFX 0C ав вуудынх/040870 ав
SFX 0C ад дуудынх/040870 ад
SFX 0C ан нуудынх/040870 ан
SFX 0C ар руудынх/040870 ар
SFX 0C ац цуудынх/040870 ац
SFX 0C ач чуудынх/040870 ач
SFX 0C ов вуудынх/040870 ов
SFX 0C од дуудынх/040870 од
SFX 0C он нуудынх/040870 он
SFX 0C ор руудынх/040870 ор
SFX 0C оц цуудынх/040870 оц
SFX 0C оч чуудынх/040870 оч
SFX 0C ид дуудынх/040870 ид
SFX 0C ир руудынх/040870 ир
SFX 0C иц цуудынх/040870 иц
SFX 0C ах хуудынх/040870 ах
SFX 0C их хуудынх/040870 их
SFX 0C ин нуудынх/040870 ин
SFX 0C ит туудынх/040870 [жчш]ит

SFX 1C Y 40
SFX 1C 0 нууд/040870 [шглмс]
SFX 1C ид дууд/040870 ид
SFX 1C ир рууд/040870 ир
SFX 1C иц цууд/040870 иц
SFX 1C ох хууд/040870 ох
SFX 1C их хууд/040870 их
SFX 1C ин нууд/040870 ин
SFX 1C ит тууд/040870 [жчш]ит
SFX 1C ов вууд/040870 ов
SFX 1C од дууд/040870 од
SFX 1C ав вууд/040870 ав
SFX 1C ад дууд/040870 ад
SFX 1C он нууд/040870 он
SFX 1C ан нууд/040870 ан
SFX 1C ор рууд/040870 ор
SFX 1C ар рууд/040870 ар
SFX 1C оц цууд/040870 оц
SFX 1C ац цууд/040870 ац
SFX 1C оч чууд/040870 оч
SFX 1C ач чууд/040870 ач
SFX 1C 0 нуудынх/040870 [шглмс]
SFX 1C ид дуудынх/040870 ид
SFX 1C ир руудынх/040870 ир
SFX 1C иц цуудынх/040870 иц
SFX 1C ох хуудынх/040870 ох
SFX 1C их хуудынх/040870 их
SFX 1C ин нуудынх/040870 ин
SFX 1C ит туудынх/040870 [жчш]ит
SFX 1C ов вуудынх/040870 ов
SFX 1C од дуудынх/040870 од
SFX 1C он нуудынх/040870 он
SFX 1C ор руудынх/040870 ор
SFX 1C оц цуудынх/040870 оц
SFX 1C оч чуудынх/040870 оч
SFX 1C ав вуудынх/040870 ав
SFX 1C ад дуудынх/040870 ад
SFX 1C ан нуудынх/040870 ан
SFX 1C ар руудынх/040870 ар
SFX 1C ац цуудынх/040870 ац
SFX 1C ач чуудынх/040870 ач

SFX 2C Y 38
SFX 2C 0 нүүд/070873 [шглмс]
SFX 2C ид дүүд/070873 ид
SFX 2C ир рүүд/070873 ир
SFX 2C иц цүүд/070873 иц
SFX 2C их хүүд/070873 их
SFX 2C ин нүүд/070873 ин
SFX 2C ит түүд/070873 [жчш]ит
SFX 2C өв вүүд/070873 өв
SFX 2C өд дүүд/070873 өд
SFX 2C өн нүүд/070873 өн
SFX 2C өр рүүд/070873 өр
SFX 2C өц цүүд/070873 өц
SFX 2C өч чүүд/070873 өч
SFX 2C эв вүүд/070873 эв
SFX 2C эд дүүд/070873 эд
SFX 2C эн нүүд/070873 эн
SFX 2C эр рүүд/070873 эр
SFX 2C эц цүүд/070873 эц
SFX 2C эч чүүд/070873 эч
SFX 2C 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [шглмс]
SFX 2C ид дүүдийнх/070873 ид
SFX 2C ир рүүдийнх/070873 ир
SFX 2C иц цүүдийнх/070873 иц
SFX 2C их хүүдийнх/070873 их
SFX 2C ин нүүдийнх/070873 ин
SFX 2C ит түүдийнх/070873 [жчш]ит
SFX 2C өв вүүдийнх/070873 өв
SFX 2C өд дүүдийнх/070873 өд
SFX 2C өн нүүдийнх/070873 өн
SFX 2C өр рүүдийнх/070873 өр
SFX 2C өц цүүдийнх/070873 өц
SFX 2C өч чүүдийнх/070873 өч
SFX 2C эв вүүдийнх/070873 эв
SFX 2C эд дүүдийнх/070873 эд
SFX 2C эн нүүдийнх/070873 эн
SFX 2C эр рүүдийнх/070873 эр
SFX 2C эц цүүдийнх/070873 эц
SFX 2C эч чүүдийнх/070873 эч

SFX 3C Y 38
SFX 3C 0 нүүд/070873 [шглмс]
SFX 3C ид дүүд/070873 ид
SFX 3C ир рүүд/070873 ир
SFX 3C иц цүүд/070873 иц
SFX 3C их хүүд/070873 их
SFX 3C ин нүүд/070873 ин
SFX 3C ит түүд/070873 [жчш]ит
SFX 3C эв вүүд/070873 эв
SFX 3C эд дүүд/070873 эд
SFX 3C эн нүүд/070873 эн
SFX 3C эр рүүд/070873 эр
SFX 3C эц цүүд/070873 эц
SFX 3C эч чүүд/070873 эч
SFX 3C өв вүүд/070873 өв
SFX 3C өд дүүд/070873 өд
SFX 3C өн нүүд/070873 өн
SFX 3C өр рүүд/070873 өр
SFX 3C өц цүүд/070873 өц
SFX 3C өч чүүд/070873 өч
SFX 3C 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [шглмс]
SFX 3C ид дүүдийнх/070873 ид
SFX 3C ир рүүдийнх/070873 ир
SFX 3C иц цүүдийнх/070873 иц
SFX 3C их хүүдийнх/070873 их
SFX 3C ин нүүдийнх/070873 ин
SFX 3C ит түүдийнх/070873 [жчш]ит
SFX 3C эв вүүдийнх/070873 эв
SFX 3C эд дүүдийнх/070873 эд
SFX 3C эн нүүдийнх/070873 эн
SFX 3C эр рүүдийнх/070873 эр
SFX 3C эц цүүдийнх/070873 эц
SFX 3C эч чүүдийнх/070873 эч
SFX 3C өв вүүдийнх/070873 өв
SFX 3C өд дүүдийнх/070873 өд
SFX 3C өн нүүдийнх/070873 өн
SFX 3C өр рүүдийнх/070873 өр
SFX 3C өц цүүдийнх/070873 өц
SFX 3C өч чүүдийнх/070873 өч

SFX 0D Y 20
SFX 0D 0 ууд/040870 [врсбпф]
SFX 0D ал лууд/040870 ал
SFX 0D ам мууд/040870 ам
SFX 0D аш шууд/040870 аш
SFX 0D аж жууд/040870 аж
SFX 0D ач чууд/040870 ач
SFX 0D ич чууд/040870 ич
SFX 0D ил лууд/040870 ил
SFX 0D им мууд/040870 им
SFX 0D их хууд/040870 их
SFX 0D 0 уудынх/040870 [врсбпф]
SFX 0D ал луудынх/040870 ал
SFX 0D ам муудынх/040870 ам
SFX 0D аш шуудынх/040870 аш
SFX 0D аж жуудынх/040870 аж
SFX 0D ач чуудынх/040870 ач
SFX 0D ич чуудынх/040870 ич
SFX 0D ил луудынх/040870 ил
SFX 0D им муудынх/040870 им
SFX 0D их хуудынх/040870 их

SFX 1D Y 20
SFX 1D 0 ууд/040870 [врсбпф]
SFX 1D ол лууд/040870 ол
SFX 1D ом мууд/040870 ом
SFX 1D ош шууд/040870 ош
SFX 1D ож жууд/040870 ож
SFX 1D оч чууд/040870 оч
SFX 1D ич чууд/040870 ич
SFX 1D ил лууд/040870 ил
SFX 1D им мууд/040870 им
SFX 1D их хууд/040870 их
SFX 1D 0 уудынх/040870 [врсбпф]
SFX 1D ол луудынх/040870 ол
SFX 1D ом муудынх/040870 ом
SFX 1D ош шуудынх/040870 ош
SFX 1D ож жуудынх/040870 ож
SFX 1D оч чуудынх/040870 оч
SFX 1D ич чуудынх/040870 ич
SFX 1D ил луудынх/040870 ил
SFX 1D им муудынх/040870 им
SFX 1D их хуудынх/040870 их

SFX 2D Y 20
SFX 2D 0 үүд/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX 2D ил лүүд/070873 ил
SFX 2D им мүүд/070873 им
SFX 2D их хүүд/070873 их
SFX 2D өл лүүд/070873 өл
SFX 2D өм мүүд/070873 өм
SFX 2D өш шүүд/070873 өш
SFX 2D өж жүүд/070873 өж
SFX 2D өч чүүд/070873 өч
SFX 2D ич чүүд/070873 ич
SFX 2D 0 үүдийнх/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX 2D ил лүүдийнх/070873 ил
SFX 2D им мүүдийнх/070873 им
SFX 2D их хүүдийнх/070873 их
SFX 2D өл лүүдийнх/070873 өл
SFX 2D өм мүүдийнх/070873 өм
SFX 2D өш шүүдийнх/070873 өш
SFX 2D өж жүүдийнх/070873 өж
SFX 2D өч чүүдийнх/070873 өч
SFX 2D ич чүүдийнх/070873 ич

SFX 3D Y 20
SFX 3D 0 үүд/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX 3D эл лүүд/070873 эл
SFX 3D эм мүүд/070873 эм
SFX 3D эш шүүд/070873 эш
SFX 3D эж жүүд/070873 эж
SFX 3D эч чүүд/070873 эч
SFX 3D ич чүүд/070873 ич
SFX 3D ил лүүд/070873 ил
SFX 3D им мүүд/070873 им
SFX 3D их хүүд/070873 их
SFX 3D 0 үүдийнх/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX 3D эл лүүдийнх/070873 эл
SFX 3D эм мүүдийнх/070873 эм
SFX 3D эш шүүдийнх/070873 эш
SFX 3D эж жүүдийнх/070873 эж
SFX 3D эч чүүдийнх/070873 эч
SFX 3D ич чүүдийнх/070873 ич
SFX 3D ил лүүдийнх/070873 ил
SFX 3D им мүүдийнх/070873 им
SFX 3D их хүүдийнх/070873 их

SFX 0E Y 10
SFX 0E ав вууд/040870 ав
SFX 0E аг гууд/040870 аг
SFX 0E ас сууд/040870 ас
SFX 0E иг гууд/040870 иг
SFX 0E 0 нууд/040870 [ийеэао]
SFX 0E ав вуудынх/040870 ав
SFX 0E аг гуудынх/040870 аг
SFX 0E ас суудынх/040870 ас
SFX 0E иг гуудынх/040870 иг
SFX 0E 0 нуудынх/040870 [ийеэао]

SFX 1E Y 10
SFX 1E иг гууд/040870 иг
SFX 1E ов вууд/040870 ов
SFX 1E ог гууд/040870 ог
SFX 1E ос сууд/040870 ос
SFX 1E 0 нууд/040870 [ийеоуа]
SFX 1E иг гуудынх/040870 иг
SFX 1E ов вуудынх/040870 ов
SFX 1E ог гуудынх/040870 ог
SFX 1E ос суудынх/040870 ос
SFX 1E 0 нуудынх/040870 [ийеоуа]

SFX 2E Y 8
SFX 2E иг гүүд/070873 иг
SFX 2E өв вүүд/070873 өв
SFX 2E өг гүүд/070873 өг
SFX 2E өс сүүд/070873 өс
SFX 2E иг гүүдийнх/070873 иг
SFX 2E өв вүүдийнх/070873 өв
SFX 2E өг гүүдийнх/070873 өг
SFX 2E өс сүүдийнх/070873 өс

SFX 3E Y 10
SFX 3E иг гүүд/070873 иг
SFX 3E эв вүүд/070873 эв
SFX 3E эг гүүд/070873 эг
SFX 3E эс сүүд/070873 эс
SFX 3E 0 нүүд/070873 [ийеэ]
SFX 3E иг гүүдийнх/070873 иг
SFX 3E эв вүүдийнх/070873 эв
SFX 3E эг гүүдийнх/070873 эг
SFX 3E эс сүүдийнх/070873 эс
SFX 3E 0 нүүдийнх/070873 [ийеэ]

SFX 00 Y 25
SFX 00 ад даа [сх]тад
SFX 00 ад даа [^джзстхчшц][дцтх]ад
SFX 00 ад даа [джзстхчшц][^мнглбврдтцхауя]ад
SFX 00 ад даа [^джзстхчшц][^мнглбврдтцхауя]ад
SFX 00 0 аа [мнглбврджзстхчшц][мнглбвр]ад
SFX 00 0 аа [мнглбврджзстхчшц][мнглбвр]од
SFX 00 ид даа [^джзстхчшц][жчш]ид
SFX 00 ид даа [сх]чид
SFX 00 0 аа [джзтчшц][жш]ид
SFX 00 0 аа [^жчш]ид
SFX 00 0 аа [джзтчшц][тч][аи]д
SFX 00 0 аа [сх][джзсхшц][аи]д
SFX 00 0 аа [джзстхчшц][дцх][аи]д
SFX 00 0 аа [^дайиятжзсшцчхмнгбвркфл]
SFX 00 0 аа -д
SFX 00 0 гаа [иая]а
SFX 00 0 аа [гн]ад
SFX 00 0 аа [дтжзсшцчхмглнбпвркфьйые]д
SFX 00 0 аа [уая][уа]д
SFX 00 0 аа [тжзсшцчхмнгбвркф]
SFX 00 ал лаа [^джзтчцш]тал
SFX 00 0 аа [джзтчцш]тал
SFX 00 0 аа [^т].л
SFX 00 0 а [^иа][иая]
SFX 00 0 гаа й
